Washington statutes.
RCW 28C.10.010

Intent.

It is the intent of this chapter to protect against practices by private vocational schools which are false, deceptive, misleading, or unfair, and to help ensure adequate educational quality at private vocational schools.

[ 1986 c 299 s 1.]